ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.aff
SFX l N 906
SFX l   0     lla         .
SFX l   0     llamanta    .
SFX l   0     llaman      .
SFX l   0     llapaj      .
SFX l   0     llataj      .
SFX l   0     llapis      .
SFX l   0     llari       .
SFX l   0     llamá       .
SFX l   0     llachá      .
SFX l   0     llachus     .
SFX l   0     llachu      .
SFX l   0     llaraj      .
SFX l   0     llaqa       .
SFX l   0     llajina     .
SFX l   0     llajinaqa   .
SFX l   0     llawan      .
SFX l   0     llapuni     .
SFX l   0     llaña       .
SFX l   0     llasina     .
SFX l   0     llapacha    .
SFX l   0     llamantapacha .
SFX l   0     llakama     .
SFX l   0     llarayku    .
SFX l   0     llajawa     .
SFX l   0     llapi       .
SFX l   0     llamantachu .
SFX l   0     llamanchu   .
SFX l   0     llapajchu   .
SFX l   0     llatajchu   .
SFX l   0     llapischu   .
SFX l   0     llarichu    .
SFX l   0     llarajchu   .
SFX l   0     llajinachu  .
SFX l   0     llawanchu   .
SFX l   0     llapunichu  .
SFX l   0     llañachu    .
SFX l   0     llasinachu  .
SFX l   0     llapachachu .
SFX l   0     llamantapachachu .
SFX l   0     llakamachu  .
SFX l   0     llaraykuchu .
SFX l   0     llajawachu  .
SFX l   0     llamantachá .
SFX l   0     llamanchá   .
SFX l   0     llapajchá   .
SFX l   0     llatajchá   .
SFX l   0     llapischá   .
SFX l   0     llarichá    .
SFX l   0     llarajchá   .
SFX l   0     llajinachá  .
SFX l   0     llawanchá   .
SFX l   0     llapunichá  .
SFX l   0     llañachá    .
SFX l   0     llasinachá  .
SFX l   0     llapachachá .
SFX l   0     llamantapachachá .
SFX l   0     llakamachá  .
SFX l   0     llaraykuchá .
SFX l   0     llajawachá  .
SFX l   0     llamantachus .
SFX l   0     llamanchus  .
SFX l   0     llapajchus  .
SFX l   0     llatajchus  .
SFX l   0     llapischus  .
SFX l   0     llarichus   .
SFX l   0     llarajchus  .
SFX l   0     llajinachus .
SFX l   0     llawanchus  .
SFX l   0     llapunichus .
SFX l   0     llañachus   .
SFX l   0     llasinachus .
SFX l   0     llapachachus .
SFX l   0     llamantapachachus .
SFX l   0     llakamachus .
SFX l   0     llaraykuchus .
SFX l   0     llajawachus .
SFX l   0     llajinamanta .
SFX l   0     llajinaman  .
SFX l   0     llajinapaj  .
SFX l   0     llajinataj  .
SFX l   0     llajinapis  .
SFX l   0     llajinari   .
SFX l   0     llajinaraj  .
SFX l   0     llajinaqa   .
SFX l   0     llajinawan  .
SFX l   0     llajinapuni .
SFX l   0     llajinaña   .
SFX l   0     llajinasina .
SFX l   0     llajinapacha .
SFX l   0     llajinamantapacha .
SFX l   0     llajinakama .
SFX l   0     llajinarayku .
SFX l   0     llajinajawa .
SFX l   0     llapimanta  .
SFX l   0     llapiman    .
SFX l   0     llapipaj    .
SFX l   0     llapitaj    .
SFX l   0     llapipis    .
SFX l   0     llapiri     .
SFX l   0     llapiraj    .
SFX l   0     llapeqa     .
SFX l   0     llapijina   .
SFX l   0     llapiwan    .
SFX l   0     llapipuni   .
SFX l   0     llapiña     .
SFX l   0     llapisina   .
SFX l   0     llapachapi  .
SFX l   0     llamantapachapi .
SFX l   0     llapikama   .
SFX l   0     llapirayku  .
SFX l   0     llapijawa   .
SFX l   0     llamantapis .
SFX l   0     llamanpis   .
SFX l   0     llapajpis   .
SFX l   0     llajinapis  .
SFX l   0     llapunipis  .
SFX l   0     llañapis    .
SFX l   0     llasinapis  .
SFX l   0     llapachapis .
SFX l   0     llamantapachapis .
SFX l   0     llakamapis  .
SFX l   0     llaraykupis .
SFX l   0     llajawapis  .
SFX l   0     llawanri    .
SFX l   0     llawantaj   .
SFX l   0     llawanpis   .
SFX l   0     llamantawan .
SFX l   0     llamanwan   .
SFX l   0     llawanpaj   .
SFX l   0     llawanmá    .
SFX l   0     llawanqa    .
SFX l   0     llajinawan  .
SFX l   0     llawanpuni  .
SFX l   0     llawanña    .
SFX l   0     llawansina  .
SFX l   0     llapachawan .
SFX l   0     llamantapachawan .
SFX l   0     llakamawan  .
SFX l   0     llaraykuwan .
SFX l   0     llajawawan  .
SFX l   0     llamantataj .
SFX l   0     llamantaj   .
SFX l   0     llapajtaj   .
SFX l   0     llatajmá    .
SFX l   0     llatajqa    .
SFX l   0     llajinataj  .
SFX l   0     llapunitaj  .
SFX l   0     llañataj    .
SFX l   0     llatajsina  .
SFX l   0     llapachataj .
SFX l   0     llamantapachataj .
SFX l   0     llakamataj  .
SFX l   0     llaraykutaj .
SFX l   0     llajawataj  .
SFX l   0     llamantari  .
SFX l   0     llamanri    .
SFX l   0     llajinari   .
SFX l   0     llapuniri   .
SFX l   0     llañari     .
SFX l   0     llapachari  .
SFX l   0     llamantapachari .
SFX l   0     llakamari   .
SFX l   0     llaraykuri  .
SFX l   0     llajawari   .
SFX l   0     llamantapaj .
SFX l   0     llamanpaj   .
SFX l   0     llapajmá    .
SFX l   0     llapajqa    .
SFX l   0     llajinapaj  .
SFX l   0     llapajpuni  .
SFX l   0     llapajña    .
SFX l   0     llapachapaj .
SFX l   0     llamantapachapaj .
SFX l   0     llakamapaj  .
SFX l   0     llaraykupaj .
SFX l   0     llajawapaj  .
SFX l   0     llamantaqa  .
SFX l   0     llamanqa    .
SFX l   0     llatajqa    .
SFX l   0     llarajqa    .
SFX l   0     llajinaqa   .
SFX l   0     llapuniqa   .
SFX l   0     llañaqa     .
SFX l   0     llapachaqa  .
SFX l   0     llamantapachaqa .
SFX l   0     llakamaqa   .
SFX l   0     llaraykuqa  .
SFX l   0     llajawaqa   .
SFX l   0     llaraykumá  .
SFX l   0     llaraykuqa  .
SFX l   0     llajinarayku .
SFX l   0     llaraykupuni .
SFX l   0     llaraykuña  .
SFX l   0     llajawarayku .
SFX l   0     llamantapuni .
SFX l   0     llamanpuni  .
SFX l   0     llapunimá   .
SFX l   0     llapuniraj  .
SFX l   0     llapuniqa   .
SFX l   0     llajinapuni .
SFX l   0     llawanpuni  .
SFX l   0     llapuniña   .
SFX l   0     llasinapuni .
SFX l   0     llapachapuni .
SFX l   0     llamantapachapuni .
SFX l   0     llakamapuni .
SFX l   0     llaraykupuni .
SFX l   0     llajawapuni .
SFX l   0     llamantaña  .
SFX l   0     llamanña    .
SFX l   0     llañamá     .
SFX l   0     llañaraj    .
SFX l   0     llañaqa     .
SFX l   0     llajinaña   .
SFX l   0     llawanña    .
SFX l   0     llasinaña   .
SFX l   0     llapachaña  .
SFX l   0     llamantapachaña .
SFX l   0     llakamaña   .
SFX l   0     llaraykuña  .
SFX l   0     llajawaña   .
SFX l   0     llamantamá  .
SFX l   0     llamantaraj .
SFX l   0     llamantataj .
SFX l   0     llamantari  .
SFX l   0     llamantapis .
SFX l   0     llamantaqa  .
SFX l   0     llajinamanta .
SFX l   0     llamantawan .
SFX l   0     llasinamanta .
SFX l   0     llamanmá    .
SFX l   0     llamanraj   .
SFX l   0     llamantaj   .
SFX l   0     llamanri    .
SFX l   0     llamanpis   .
SFX l   0     llamanqa    .
SFX l   0     llajinaman  .
SFX l   0     llamanwan   .
SFX l   0     llamantasina .
SFX l   0     llamansina  .
SFX l   0     llapajsina  .
SFX l   0     llatajsina  .
SFX l   0     llapissina  .
SFX l   0     llarisina   .
SFX l   0     llarajsina  .
SFX l   0     llajinasina .
SFX l   0     llawansina  .
SFX l   0     llapunisina .
SFX l   0     llañasina   .
SFX l   0     llapachasina .
SFX l   0     llamantapachasina .
SFX l   0     llakamasina .
SFX l   0     llaraykusina .
SFX l   0     llajawasina .
SFX l   0     llakamapaj  .
SFX l   0     llakamataj  .
SFX l   0     llakamapis  .
SFX l   0     llakamari   .
SFX l   0     llakamaraj  .
SFX l   0     llajinakama .
SFX l   0     llakamawan  .
SFX l   0     llakamapuni .
SFX l   0     llakamasina .
SFX l   0     llajawapaj  .
SFX l   0     llajawataj  .
SFX l   0     llajawapis  .
SFX l   0     llajawari   .
SFX l   0     llajawaraj  .
SFX l   0     llajinajawa .
SFX l   0     llajawawan  .
SFX l   0     llajawapuni .
SFX l   0     llajawaña   .
SFX l   0     llapachajawa .
SFX l   0     llamantapachajawa .
SFX l   0     llaraykujawa .
SFX l   0     llamantapacha .
SFX l   0     llapachapaj .
SFX l   0     llapachataj .
SFX l   0     llapachapis .
SFX l   0     llapachari  .
SFX l   0     llapachamá  .
