ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.dic
Andahuaylas/atghlmwjk
Austria/atghlmwjk
Bolivar/atghlmwjk
Camiri/atghlmwjk
Charazani/atghlmwjk
Cochabamba/atghlmwjk
Cuzco/atghlmwjk
Eugenio/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Gabriel/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Heath/atghlmwjk
Inti/atghlmwjk
Joaquin/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Kuntisuyu/atghlmwjk
MAS/atghlmwjk
Marikanchi/atghlmwjk
Montes/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Oporto/atghlmwjk
Pasco/atghlmwjk
Pocaguaros/atghlmwjk
Q'araqollu/atghlmwjk
Ravelo/atghlmwjk
Sallkamaywa/atghlmwjk
T'arata/atghlmwjk
Torres/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Ujllu/atghlmwjk
Victor/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Waskar/atghlmwjk
abunu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
akarway/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
amaraj/atlw
anqallu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
api/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
arawikoj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
asuy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
awarmantu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
aykura/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
añasqeru/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'amaj/aAtTlwW
ch'atakuy/aAtTlwW
ch'ipa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'ojtawma/aAtTlwW
ch'usku/aAtTlwW
chajmiri/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
challwaqhatu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chaskej/aAtTlwW
chhallcha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chhikijruna/aAtTlwW
chimiku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chiriyasqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chukiapu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chupi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ijma/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
intijchinpun/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
iskurumi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jach'una/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jana/aAtTlwW
japu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jawajawa/aAtTlwW
jaylli/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jipya/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jullu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
juñi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'ama/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'aspichaki/aAtTlwW
k'iraj/aAtTlwW
k'ullchuwa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'uyoj/aAl
kallkuchej/aAtTlwW
kaphiaruna/aAtTlwW
kaya/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khallki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khipusqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
killa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kintu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kukuma/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kurku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
larq'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llalli/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llapaatipaj/aAtTlwW
llawt'u/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llojt'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
lluq'ana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
machas/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mallma/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
manka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
maru/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mayunej/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
millwa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mitikaj/aAtTlwW
mullphasqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
musqoj/aAtTlwW
ninapillku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'ajrapanpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'illqo/aAtTlwW
p'unpu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pachañas/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
panpasami/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
paskana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
phajsariymit'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
phiri/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pintoj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pupu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'ara/aAtTlwW
q'ewsuñawi/aAtTlwW
q'oyuyasqa/aAtTlwW
qanchis/aAtTlwW
qellpu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qharisunqo/aAtTlwW
qhon/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qokuy/aAtTlwW
qonqorchaki/atlw
ranpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
rumadisu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sajwaj/aAtTlwW
saraqhatu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
siki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sirawa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sonqotu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sut'i/aAtTlwW
t'ijsiy/aAtTlwW
t'upasqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tarapaka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
thulltu/aAtTlwW
titinchaj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tuti/aAtTlwW
unku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ususi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wachoj/aAtTlwW
walqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
waqaychaj/aAtTlwW
waskarsupa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wayrachaki/aAtTlwW
winpilla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
yanapaj/aAtTlwW
yura/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ñojch'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
